Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-809
Teachers' entry-level certificates or permits; qualifications.

In addition to the requirements in section 79-808, the maximum which the board may require for the issuance of any entry-level certificate or permit shall be that the applicant (1) has a baccalaureate degree that qualifies for a certificate to teach, (2) has satisfactorily completed, within two years of the date of application, an approved program at a standard institution of higher education, (3) has special education training, (4) has earned college credit in an approved program, at a standard institution of higher education, for which endorsement is sought, and (5) has paid a nonrefundable fee to the department as provided in section 79-810.

Laws 1963, c. 491, § 4, p. 1570;

Laws 1976, LB 833, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 994, § 10;

Laws 1985, LB 633, § 8;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 21;

Laws 1994, LB 1310, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 754, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1247.06;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 439;

Laws 2001, LB 314, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 685, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB150, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 85.

A state agency which requires, as a minimum for certification of an individual, the maximum requirement permitted by statute does not violate the limiting terms of such statute. The state has a compelling interest in the quality and ability of those who are employed to teach its young people, and a requirement that such teacher possess an appropriate baccalaureate degree is neither arbitrary nor unreasonable and is a reliable indicator of the probability of success as a teacher. State ex rel. Douglas v. Faith Baptist Church of Louisville, 207 Neb. 802, 301 N.W.2d 571 (1981).